Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3210
Practicing respiratory care practitioners; license issued; conditions.

The department, with the recommendation of the board, shall issue a license to perform respiratory care to an applicant who, on or before July 17, 1986, has passed the Certified Respiratory Therapy Technician or Registered Respiratory Therapist examination administered by the National Board for Respiratory Care or the appropriate accrediting agency acceptable to the board.

Laws 1986, LB 277, § 15;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 84;

Laws 2003, LB 245, § 15;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,233;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1076.